District of Columbia statutes.
32-1302

When wages must be paid; exceptions.

Every employer shall pay all wages earned to his employees at least twice during each calendar month, on regular paydays designated in advance by the employer; provided, however, that an interval of not more than 10 working days may elapse between the end of the pay period covered and the regular payday designated by the employer, except where a different period is specified in a collective agreement between an employer and a bona fide labor organization; provided further, that where, by contract or custom, an employer has paid wages at least once each calendar month, he may lawfully continue to do so. Wages shall be paid on designated paydays in lawful money of the United States, or checks on banks payable upon demand by the bank upon which drawn.

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 2
This section is referenced in § 32-1303, § 32-1304, and § 32-1307.
1981 Ed., § 36-102.
1973 Ed., § 36-602.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Wage Theft Prevention Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-2, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 4552).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2016 D.C. Law 21-101, April 6, 2016, 63 DCR 2220, 20 DCSTAT 3142).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Wage Theft Prevention Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-8, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2669, 21 STAT 830).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Wage Theft Prevention Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-66, May 22, 2015, 62 DCR 6867, 21 DCSTAT 1446).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-291, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1207).